North Carolina statutes. Chapter 74. Mines and Quarries.
Article 7. The Mining Act of 1971.
§ 74-58.
Suspension or revocation of permit.

Whenever the Department shall have reason to believe that a violation of (i) this Article, (ii) any rules adopted under this Article, or (iii) the terms and conditions of a permit, including the approved reclamation plan, has taken place, it shall serve written notice of the apparent violation upon the operator, specifying the facts constituting the apparent violation and informing the operator of the operator’s right to an informal conference with the Department. The date for an informal conference shall be not less than 15 nor more than 30 days after the date of the notice, unless the Department and the operator mutually agree on another date. If the operator or the operator’s representative does not appear at the informal conference, or if the Department following the informal conference finds that there has been a violation, the Department may suspend the permit until the violation is corrected or may revoke the permit where the violation appears to be willful, or where the permittee has failed to pay the fee or late payment penalties required by

G.S. 74-55(b)

.

The effective date of any suspension or revocation shall be 30 days following the date of the decision. The filing of a petition for a contested case under

G.S. 74-61

shall stay the effective date until issuance of a final decision. If the Department finds at the time of its initial decision that any delay in correcting a violation would result in imminent peril to life or danger to property or to the environment, it shall promptly initiate a proceeding for injunctive relief under

G.S. 74-64

hereof and Rule 65 of the Rules of Civil Procedure. The pendency of any appeal from a suspension or revocation of a permit shall have no effect upon an action for injunctive relief.

Any operator whose permit has been suspended or revoked shall be denied a new permit or reinstatement of the suspended permit to engage in mining until the operator gives evidence satisfactory to the Department of the operator’s ability and intent to fully comply with the provisions of this Article and rules adopted under this Article, and the terms and conditions of the permit, including the approved reclamation plan, and that the operator has satisfactorily corrected all previous violations.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 13; 1973, c. 1262, s. 33; 1979, c. 252, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 82A; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 568, s. 8; 2011-398, s. 29; 2017-209, s. 13(g).

Cross References.

For Rules of Civil Procedure, see

G.S. 1A-1

.

§ 74-59.
Bond forfeiture proceedings.

Whenever the Department determines the necessity of a bond forfeiture under the provisions of

G.S. 74-56

, or whenever it revokes an operating permit under the provisions of

G.S. 74-58

, it shall request the Attorney General to initiate forfeiture proceedings against the bond or other security filed by the operator under

G.S. 74-54

; provided, however, that no such request shall be made for forfeiture of a bond until the surety has been given written notice of the violation and a reasonable opportunity to take corrective action. Such proceedings shall be brought in the name of the State of North Carolina. In such proceedings, the face amount of the bond or other security, less any amount released by the Department pursuant to

G.S. 74-56

, shall be treated as liquidated damages and subject to forfeiture. All funds collected as a result of such proceedings shall be placed in a special fund and used by the Department to carry out, to the extent possible, the reclamation measures which the operator has failed to complete. If the amount of the bond or other security filed pursuant to this section proves to be insufficient to complete the required reclamation pursuant to the approved reclamation plan, the operator shall be liable to the Department for any excess above the amount of the bond or other security which may be required to defray the cost of completing the required reclamation.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 14.

§ 74-60.
Notice.

Whenever in this Article written notice is required to be given by the Department, such notice shall be mailed by registered or certified mail to the permanent address of the operator set forth in his most recent application for an operating permit or for a modification of such permit. No other notice shall be required.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 15; 2017-209, s. 13(h).

§ 74-61.
Administrative and judicial review of decisions.

An applicant, permittee, or affected person may contest a decision of the Department to deny, suspend, modify, or revoke a permit or a reclamation plan, to refuse to release part or all of a bond or other security, or to assess a civil penalty by filing a petition for a contested case under

G.S. 150B-23

within 30 days after the Department makes the decision. Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes governs judicial review of a decision of the Commission.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 16; 1973, c. 1262, s. 33; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 252, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 86; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 568, s. 9; 2011-398, s. 30.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 30, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to contested cases commenced on or after that date, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The Commission shall make the final decision in a contested case under this section.”

§ 74-62.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 83.

§ 74-63.
Rules.

The Commission may adopt rules necessary to administer this Article.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 18; 1973, c. 1262, s. 33; c. 1331, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 84.

§ 74-64.
Penalties for violations.

Civil Penalties.

A civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) may be assessed by the Department against any person who fails to secure a valid operating permit prior to engaging in mining, as required by

G.S. 74-50

. No civil penalty shall be assessed until the operator has been given notice of the violation pursuant to

G.S. 74-60

. Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute a separate violation and a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day may be assessed for each day the violation continues.

Any permitted operator who violates any of the provisions of this Article, any rules adopted under this Article, or any of the terms and conditions of the mining permit shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00). Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute a separate violation. Prior to the assessment of any civil penalty, written notice of the violation shall be given. The notice shall describe the violation with reasonable particularity, shall specify a time period reasonably calculated to permit the violator to complete actions to correct the violation, and shall state that failure to correct the violation within that period may result in the assessment of a civil penalty.

In determining the amount of the penalty, the Department shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation, the cost of rectifying the damage, the amount of money the violator saved by the noncompliance, whether the violation was committed willfully, and the prior record of the violator in complying or failing to comply with this Article.

The Department shall determine the amount of the civil penalty to be assessed pursuant to G.S. 74-64(a)(1) and shall give notice to the operator of the assessment of the civil penalty pursuant to

G.S. 74-60

, or by any means authorized by

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4. The notice shall set forth in detail the violation or violations for which the civil penalty has been assessed. The operator may appeal the assessment of any civil penalty assessed pursuant to this section in accordance with the procedures set forth in

G.S. 74-61

.

The notice of assessment shall direct the violator to pay the assessment or contest the assessment as provided in

G.S. 74-61

. If the violator does not pay the assessment within 30 days after receipt of the notice of assessment or within 30 days after receipt of the final agency decision, where the assessment has been contested, the Department shall request the Attorney General to institute a civil action in superior court to recover the amount of the penalty. A civil action under this section shall be filed within three years of the date the final agency decision was served on the violator.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

In addition to other remedies, the Department may request the Attorney General to institute any appropriate action or proceedings to prevent, restrain, correct or abate any violation of this Article or any rules adopted under this Article, or the obstruction, hampering, or interference with an authorized representative of the Department while the representative is carrying out official duties pursuant to this Article.

Criminal Penalties. — In addition to other penalties provided by this Article, any operator who engages in mining in willful violation of the provisions of this Article or of any rules promulgated hereunder or who willfully misrepresents any fact in any action taken pursuant to this Article or willfully gives false information in any application or report required by this Article shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall only be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense. Each day of continued violation after written notification shall be considered a separate offense.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 19; 1979, c. 252, s. 2; 1981, c. 787, ss. 7, 8; 1987, c. 246, s. 1; c. 827, s. 85; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 16; 1993, c. 539, s. 555; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 568, s. 10; 1998-215, s. 42.

§ 74-65.
Effect on local zoning regulations.

No provision of this Article shall be construed to supersede or otherwise affect or prevent the enforcement of any zoning regulation or ordinance duly adopted by an incorporated city or county or by any agency or department of the State of North Carolina, except insofar as a provision of said regulation or ordinance is in direct conflict with this Article.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 20.

§ 74-66.
Private relief against nuisance or hazard.

No provision of this Article shall be construed to restrict or impair the right of any private or public person, association, corporation, partnership, officer, or agency to bring any legal or equitable action for redress against nuisances or hazards.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 21.

§ 74-67.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this Article shall not apply to those activities of the Department of Transportation, nor of any person, firm, or corporation acting under contract with the Department of Transportation, on highway rights-of-way or borrow pits maintained solely in connection with the construction, repair, and maintenance of the public road systems of North Carolina; provided, that this exemption shall not become effective until the Department of Transportation shall have adopted reclamation standards applying to such activities and such standards have been approved by the Commission. The provisions of this Article shall not apply to mining on federal lands under a valid permit from the U.S. Forest Service or the U.S. Bureau of Land Management.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 22; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; c. 1262, s. 33; 1977, c. 464, s. 34; 2012-143, s. 1(d); 2013-410, s. 7(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-410, s. 7(c), effective August 23, 2013, substituted “the” for “said” following “under contract with,” and deleted “North Carolina Mining and Energy” preceding “Commission” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 74-68.
Cooperation with other agencies; contracts and grants.

The Department, with the approval of the Governor, and in order to accomplish any of the purposes of the Department, may apply for, accept, and expend grants from the federal government and its agencies and from any foundation, corporation, association, or individual; may enter into contracts relating to such grants; and may comply with the terms, conditions, and limitations of any such grant or contract. The Department may engage in such research as may be appropriate to further its ability to accomplish its purposes under this Article, and may contract for such research to be done by others. The Department may cooperate with any federal, state, or local government or agency, of this or any other state, in mutual programs to improve the enforcement of this Article or to accomplish its purposes more successfully.

History.

1971, c. 545, s. 23.

§§ 74-69 through 74-74.

Reserved for future codification purposes.